District of Columbia statutes.
31-5302

Operation for benefit of members and their beneficiaries; bylaws.

(a)

(1)

A society shall operate for the benefit of its members and their beneficiaries by:

(A)

Providing benefits as specified in § 31-5313; and

(B)

Operating for one or more social, intellectual, educational, charitable, benevolent, moral, fraternal, patriotic, or religious purposes for the benefit of its members, which may also be extended to others.

(2)

The purposes of paragraph (2) of this subsection may be carried out directly by the society, or indirectly through subsidiary corporations or affiliated organizations.

(b)

Every society shall have the power to adopt laws and rules for the government of the society, the admission of its members, and the management of its affairs. It shall have the power to change, alter, add to, or amend such laws and rules and shall have other powers as are necessary and incidental to carrying into effect the objects and purposes of the society.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1203, 45 DCR 1172
This section is referenced in § 31-5309.
1981 Ed., § 35-1232.